Utah statutes.
78B-2-215.   Adverse possession -- Payment of taxes -- Proviso -- Tax title.
Payment of all the taxes levied and assessed upon the real property for a
period of not less than four years by the holder of a tax title to the real
property or his predecessors is sufficient to satisfy the requirements of this
chapter regarding the payment of taxes necessary to establish adverse
possession.
